District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.21

Repealed

Stock certificates — Issuance of fractional shares or scrip.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 189, ch. 269, § 21
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(l), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.21.
1981 Ed., § 29-321.
1973 Ed., § 29-908h.